Utah statutes.
38-12-102.   Notice requirements for lien filings -- Exceptions.

(1)  A lien claimant or the lien claimant's agent shall send by certified mail a written copy of the notice of lien to the last-known address of the person against whom the notice of lien is filed no later than 30 days after the day on which a lien claimant or the lien claimant's authorized agent files a notice of lien meeting the requirements of Subsection (2):

(a)  for recordation with:

(i)  a county recorder;

(ii)  a county clerk; or

(iii)  a clerk of the court; or

(b)  in the case of a lien on an aircraft under Section 38-13-201, with the Federal Aviation Administration.

(2)  The notice of lien described in Subsection (1) shall contain the following information:

(a)  the name and address of the person against whom the lien is filed;

(b) (i)  a statement that certain property owned by the person against whom the lien is filed is subject to a lien;

(ii)  the amount of the judgment, settlement, or compromise if the lien is based on a charge against or interest in a judgment, settlement, or compromise; or

(iii)  the amount of state taxes owed;

(c)  the article number contained on the certified mail receipt;

(d)  the date the notice of lien was filed; and

(e)  the name and address of the lien claimant.

(3)  The notice requirements of Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to:

(a)  a preconstruction or construction lien as provided in Title 38, Chapter 1a, Preconstruction and Construction Liens;

(b)  a lessors' lien as provided in Title 38, Chapter 3, Lessors' Liens;

(c)  a federal tax lien as provided in Title 38, Chapter 6, Federal Tax Liens;

(d)  a hospital lien as provided in Title 38, Chapter 7, Hospital Lien Law;

(e)  a self-service storage facilities lien as provided in Title 38, Chapter 8, Self-Service Storage Facilities;

(f)  an oil, gas, or mining lien as provided in Title 38, Chapter 10, Oil, Gas, and Mining Liens;

(g)  a claim against the Residence Lien Recovery Fund as provided in Title 38, Chapter 11, Residence Lien Restriction and Lien Recovery Fund Act;

(h)  a trust deed;

(i)  a mortgage;

(j)  any interests subject to a security agreement as defined in Section 70A-9a-102;

(k)  any other liens subject to the same or stricter notice requirements than those imposed by Subsections (1) and (2); or

(l)  a court judgment or abstract of a court judgment presented for recording in the office of a county recorder.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

